Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [290.0696] CREDIT FOR CONTRIBUTIONS TO WOMEN'S PREGNANCY CENTERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Credit allowed; limitation; carryforward. new text end new text begin (a) A taxpayer is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this chapter equal to the amount of contributions made by the taxpayer to a women's pregnancy center, up to $50,000. new text end new text begin (b) If the amount of the credit determined under this section for any taxable year exceeds the liability for tax under this chapter, the excess is a credit carryover to the next taxable year. The entire amount of the excess unused credit for the taxable year must be carried first to the next taxable year. The amount of the unused credit that may be added under this paragraph must not exceed the taxpayer's liability for tax less the credit for the taxable year. new text end new text begin (c) An eligible taxpayer claiming a credit under this section may not also claim the credit under section 297I.20, subdivision 8, for the same contribution. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "women's pregnancy center" means an organization that provides information, referrals, and support to encourage and assist pregnant women in carrying their pregnancies to term and in caring for their children after birth; and new text end new text begin (2) "contribution" means a charitable contribution allowable to the taxpayer as a deduction under section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, including the denial of the deduction under the Internal Revenue Code, section 408(d)(8), except that the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, section 170(b)(1)(G), apply regardless of the taxable year. new text end new text begin (e) The credit may not be claimed for any amount used to claim: new text end new text begin (1) the itemized deduction under section 290.0122, subdivision 4; or new text end new text begin (2) the subtraction under section 290.0132, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (f) For a nonresident or part-year resident, the credit under this section must be allocated using the percentage calculated in section 290.06, subdivision 2c, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Partnerships; multiple owners. new text end new text begin Credits granted or transferred to a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a partnership, an S corporation, or multiple owners of property are passed through to the partners, members, shareholders, or owners, respectively, pro rata to each partner, member, shareholder, or owner based on their share of the entity's assets or as specially allocated in their organizational documents or any other executed agreement, as of the last day of the taxable year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner to maintain list. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, must maintain a list of qualifying women's pregnancy centers to which contributions are eligible for the credit under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297I.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Credit for contributions to women's pregnancy centers. new text end new text begin A taxpayer may claim a credit against the premiums tax imposed under this chapter equal to the amount of credit calculated under section 290.0696, provided that the taxpayer is not also claiming a credit under that section for the same contribution. If the amount of the credit exceeds the taxpayer's liability for tax under this chapter, the excess is a credit carryover to the next taxable year. The entire amount of the excess unused credit for the taxable year must be carried first to the next taxable year. The amount of the unused credit that may be added under this paragraph must not exceed the taxpayer's liability for tax less the credit for the taxable year. This credit does not affect the calculation of fire state aid under section 477B.03 and police state aid under section 477C.03. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end